Nebraska, session 109, LB613.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 77-2711, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2711 (1)(a) The Tax Commissioner shall enforce sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713 and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to
the administration and enforcement of such sections.
(b) The Tax Commissioner may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or
regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may employ accountants, auditors, investigators,
assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and may delegate authority to his or her
representatives to conduct hearings, prescribe regulations, or perform any
other duties imposed by such act.
(3)(a) Every seller, every retailer, and every person storing, using, or
otherwise consuming in this state property purchased from a retailer shall keep
such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers in such form as
the Tax Commissioner may reasonably require.
(b) Every such seller, retailer, or person shall keep such records for not
less than three years from the making of such records unless the Tax
Commissioner in writing sooner authorized their destruction.
(4) The Tax Commissioner or any person authorized in writing by him or her
may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person selling
property and any person liable for the use tax and may investigate the
character of the business of the person in order to verify the accuracy of any
return made or, if no return is made by the person, to ascertain and determine
the amount required to be paid. In the examination of any person selling
property or of any person liable for the use tax, an inquiry shall be made as
to the accuracy of the reporting of city and county sales and use taxes for
which the person is liable under the Local Option Revenue Act or sections
13-319, 13-324, 13-2813, and 77-6403 and the accuracy of the allocation made
between the various counties, cities, villages, and municipal counties of the
tax due. The Tax Commissioner may make or cause to be made copies of resale or
exemption certificates and may pay a reasonable amount to the person having
custody of the records for providing such copies.
(5) The taxpayer shall have the right to keep or store his or her records
at a point outside this state and shall make his or her records available to
the Tax Commissioner at all times.
(6) In administration of the use tax, the Tax Commissioner may require the
filing of reports by any person or class of persons having in his, her, or
their possession or custody information relating to sales of property, the
storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the tax. The report
shall be filed when the Tax Commissioner requires and shall set forth the names
and addresses of purchasers of the property, the sales price of the property,
the date of sale, and such other information as the Tax Commissioner may
require.
(7) It shall be a Class I misdemeanor for the Tax Commissioner or any
official or employee of the Tax Commissioner, the State Treasurer, or the
Department of Administrative Services to make known in any manner whatever the
business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an investigation of
records and activities of any retailer or any other person visited or examined
in the discharge of official duty or the amount or source of income, profits,
losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof, set forth or disclosed in any
return, or to permit any return or copy thereof, or any book containing any
abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person not
connected with the Tax Commissioner. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to prohibit (a) the delivery to a taxpayer, his or her duly authorized
representative, or his or her successors, receivers, trustees, executors,
administrators, assignees, or guarantors, if directly interested, of a
certified copy of any return or report in connection with his or her tax, (b)
the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of
particular reports or returns and the items thereof, (c) the inspection by the
Attorney General, other legal representative of the state, or county attorney
of the reports or returns of any taxpayer when either (i) information on the
reports or returns is considered by the Attorney General to be relevant to any
action or proceeding instituted by the taxpayer or against whom an action or
proceeding is being considered or has been commenced by any state agency or the
county or (ii) the taxpayer has instituted an action to review the tax based
-1-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
thereon or an action or proceeding against the taxpayer for collection of tax
or failure to comply with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 is being considered
or has been commenced, (d) the furnishing of any information to the United
States Government or to states allowing similar privileges to the Tax
Commissioner, (e) the disclosure of information and records to a collection
agency contracting with the Tax Commissioner pursuant to sections 77-377.01 to
77-377.04, (f) the disclosure to another party to a transaction of information
and records concerning the transaction between the taxpayer and the other
party, (g) the disclosure of information pursuant to section 77-27,195,
77-5731, 77-6837, 77-6839, or 77-6928, or (h) the disclosure of information to
the Department of Labor necessary for the administration of the Employment
Security Law, the Contractor Registration Act, or the Employee Classification
Act.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit the Postal Inspector of the United States Postal
Service or his or her delegates to inspect the reports or returns of any person
filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 when information on the
reports or returns is relevant to any action or proceeding instituted or being
considered by the United States Postal Service against such person for the
fraudulent use of the mails to carry and deliver false and fraudulent tax
returns to the Tax Commissioner with the intent to defraud the State of
Nebraska or to evade the payment of Nebraska state taxes.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit other tax officials of this state to inspect the
tax returns, reports, and applications filed under sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713, but such inspection shall be permitted only for purposes of enforcing
a tax law and only to the extent and under the conditions prescribed by the
rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may, upon request, provide the county board of any county
which has exercised the authority granted by section 81-3716 with a list of the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the county for which lodging
sales tax returns have been filed or for which lodging sales taxes have been
remitted for the county's County Visitors Promotion Fund under the Nebraska
Visitors Development Act.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the requesting county for
which lodging sales tax returns have been filed for a specified period and the
fact that lodging sales taxes remitted by or on behalf of the hotel have
constituted a portion of the total sum remitted by the state to the county for
a specified period under the provisions of the Nebraska Visitors Development
Act. No additional information shall be revealed.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request by the Auditor of Public
Accounts or the office of Legislative Audit, make tax returns and tax return
information open to inspection by or disclosure to the Auditor of Public
Accounts or employees of the office of Legislative Audit for the purpose of and
to the extent necessary in making an audit of the Department of Revenue
pursuant to section 50-1205 or 84-304. Confidential tax returns and tax return
information shall be audited only upon the premises of the Department of
Revenue. All audit work papers pertaining to the audit of the Department of
Revenue shall be stored in a secure place in the Department of Revenue.
(b) No employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or the office of
Legislative Audit shall disclose to any person, other than another Auditor of
Public Accounts or office employee whose official duties require such
disclosure, any return or return information described in the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 in a form which can be associated with or otherwise identify,
directly or indirectly, a particular taxpayer.
(c) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. For purposes of this subsection, employee
includes a former Auditor of Public Accounts or office of Legislative Audit
employee.
(12) For purposes of this subsection and subsections (11) and (14) of this
section:
(a) Disclosure means the making known to any person in any manner a tax
return or return information;
(b) Return information means:
(i) A taxpayer's identification number and (A) the nature, source, or
amount of his or her income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions,
credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax withheld,
deficiencies, over assessments, or tax payments, whether the taxpayer's return
was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or
processing or (B) any other data received by, recorded by, prepared by,
furnished to, or collected by the Tax Commissioner with respect to a return or
the determination of the existence or possible existence of liability or the
amount of liability of any person for any tax, penalty, interest, fine,
forfeiture, or other imposition or offense; and
(ii) Any part of any written determination or any background file document
relating to such written determination; and
(c) Tax return or return means any tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, provided for, or permitted under sections 77-2701 to
77-2713 which is filed with the Tax Commissioner by, on behalf of, or with
respect to any person and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
-2-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists which are supplemental to or part
of the filed return.
(13) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner shall, upon request, provide any municipality which has
adopted the local option sales tax under the Local Option Revenue Act with a
list of the names and addresses of the retailers which have collected the local
option sales tax for the municipality and any additional information requested
by the municipality so long as the information does not include any data
detailing the specific revenue, expenses, or operations of any particular
business. A The request may be made no greater than three times annually and
shall be submitted to the Tax Commissioner on or before June 30 of each year.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the names
and addresses of the retailers. The Tax Commissioner may provide additional
information to a municipality so long as the information does not include any
data detailing the specific revenue, expenses, or operations of any particular
business.
(14)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request, provide an individual
certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection representing a municipality
which has adopted the local option sales and use tax under the Local Option
Revenue Act with confidential sales and use tax returns and sales and use tax
return information regarding taxpayers that possess a sales tax permit and the
amounts remitted by such permitholders at locations within the boundaries of
the requesting municipality or with confidential business use tax returns and
business use tax return information regarding taxpayers that file a Nebraska
and Local Business Use Tax Return and the amounts remitted by such taxpayers at
locations within the boundaries of the requesting municipality. Any written
request pursuant to this subsection shall provide the Department of Revenue
with no less than ten business days to prepare the sales and use tax returns
and sales and use tax return information requested. If The individual certified
under subdivision (b) of this subsection shall review such returns and return
information only upon the premises of the department, except that such
limitation shall not apply if the certifying municipality has an agreement in
effect under the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment
Act. In such case, the individual certified under subdivision (b) of this
subsection requests may request that copies of such returns and return
information be sent to him or her by electronic transmission, the Tax
Commissioner shall abide by the request and send such information secured in a
manner as determined by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) Each municipality that seeks to request information under subdivision
(a) of this subsection shall certify to the Department of Revenue one
individual who is authorized by such municipality to make such a request for
and review the documents described in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The
individual may be a municipal employee or an individual who contracts with the
requesting municipality to provide financial, accounting, or other
administrative services.
(c) The individual certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection may
disclose the copies of the returns and return information described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection to another municipal employee for purposes
of (i) verifying the accuracy of the collection, analysis, and forecasting,
(ii) verifying the accuracy of the allocation made between various
municipalities of the tax due, or (iii) verifying the taxes are used according
to the purpose voted on by the people of the municipality. An No individual
certified by a municipality pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection
shall not disclose to any person any information obtained pursuant to a review
under this subsection other than for the purposes described in this subsection.
An individual certified by a municipality pursuant to subdivision (b) of this
subsection shall remain subject to this subsection after he or she (i) is no
longer certified or (ii) is no longer in the employment of or under contract
with the certifying municipality.
(d) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(e) The Department of Revenue shall not be held liable by any person for
an impermissible disclosure by a municipality or any agent or employee thereof
of any information obtained pursuant to a review under this subsection.
(15) In all proceedings under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Tax
Commissioner may act for and on behalf of the people of the State of Nebraska.
The Tax Commissioner in his or her discretion may waive all or part of any
penalties provided by the provisions of such act or interest on delinquent
taxes specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted.
(16)(a) The purpose of this subsection is to set forth the state's policy
for the protection of the confidentiality rights of all participants in the
system operated pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement and of
the privacy interests of consumers who deal with model 1 sellers.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Anonymous data means information that does not identify a person;
(ii) Confidential taxpayer information means all information that is
protected under a member state's laws, regulations, and privileges; and
(iii) Personally identifiable information means information that
identifies a person.
(c) The state agrees that a fundamental precept for model 1 sellers is to
preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting their anonymity. With very
-3-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
limited exceptions, a certified service provider shall perform its tax
calculation, remittance, and reporting functions without retaining the
personally identifiable information of consumers.
(d) The governing board of the member states in the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement may certify a certified service provider only if that
certified service provider certifies that:
(i) Its system has been designed and tested to ensure that the fundamental
precept of anonymity is respected;
(ii) Personally identifiable information is only used and retained to the
extent necessary for the administration of model 1 with respect to exempt
purchasers;
(iii) It provides consumers clear and conspicuous notice of its
information practices, including what information it collects, how it collects
the information, how it uses the information, how long, if at all, it retains
the information, and whether it discloses the information to member states.
Such notice shall be satisfied by a written privacy policy statement accessible
by the public on the website of the certified service provider;
(iv) Its collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable
information is limited to that required by the member states to ensure the
validity of exemptions from taxation that are claimed by reason of a consumer's
status or the intended use of the goods or services purchased; and
(v) It provides adequate technical, physical, and administrative
safeguards so as to protect personally identifiable information from
unauthorized access and disclosure.
(e) The state shall provide public notification to consumers, including
exempt purchasers, of the state's practices relating to the collection, use,
and retention of personally identifiable information.
(f) When any personally identifiable information that has been collected
and retained is no longer required for the purposes set forth in subdivision
(16)(d)(iv) of this section, such information shall no longer be retained by
the member states.
(g) When personally identifiable information regarding an individual is
retained by or on behalf of the state, it shall provide reasonable access by
such individual to his or her own information in the state's possession and a
right to correct any inaccurately recorded information.
(h) If anyone other than a member state, or a person authorized by that
state's law or the agreement, seeks to discover personally identifiable
information, the state from whom the information is sought should make a
reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of such request.
(i) This privacy policy is subject to enforcement by the Attorney General.
(j) All other laws and regulations regarding the collection, use, and
maintenance of confidential taxpayer information remain fully applicable and
binding. Without limitation, this subsection does not enlarge or limit the
state's authority to:
(i) Conduct audits or other reviews as provided under the agreement and
state law;
(ii) Provide records pursuant to the federal Freedom of Information Act,
disclosure laws with governmental agencies, or other regulations;
(iii) Prevent, consistent with state law, disclosure of confidential
taxpayer information;
(iv) Prevent, consistent with federal law, disclosure or misuse of federal
return information obtained under a disclosure agreement with the Internal
Revenue Service; and
(v) Collect, disclose, disseminate, or otherwise use anonymous data for
governmental purposes.
Sec. 2. Section 77-27,144, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,144 (1) The Tax Commissioner shall collect the tax imposed by any
incorporated municipality concurrently with collection of a state tax in the
same manner as the state tax is collected. The Tax Commissioner shall remit
monthly the proceeds of the tax to the incorporated municipalities levying the
tax, after deducting the amount of refunds made and three percent of the
remainder to be credited to the Municipal Equalization Fund.
(2)(a) Deductions for a refund made pursuant to section 77-4105, 77-4106,
77-5725, or 77-5726 and owed by a city of the first class, city of the second
class, or village shall be delayed for one year after the refund has been made
to the taxpayer. The Department of Revenue shall notify the municipality liable
for a refund exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars of the pending refund,
the amount of the refund, and the month in which the deduction will be made or
begin, except that if the amount of a refund claimed under section 77-4105,
77-4106, 77-5725, or 77-5726 exceeds twenty-five percent of the municipality's
total sales and use tax receipts, net of any refunds or sales tax collection
fees, for the municipality's prior fiscal year, the department shall deduct the
refund over the period of one year in equal monthly amounts beginning after the
one-year notification period required by this subdivision.
(b) Deductions for a refund made pursuant to section 77-4105, 77-4106,
77-5725, or 77-5726 and owed by a city of the metropolitan class or city of the
primary class shall be made as follows:
(i) During calendar year 2023, such deductions shall be made in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section; and
(ii) During calendar year 2024 and each calendar year thereafter, such
deductions shall be made based on estimated amounts as described in this
subdivision. On or before March 1, 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year
-4-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
thereafter, the Department of Revenue shall notify each city of the
metropolitan class and city of the primary class of the total amount of such
refunds that are estimated to be paid during the following calendar year. Such
estimated amount shall be used to establish the total amount to be deducted in
the following calendar year. The department shall deduct such amount over the
following calendar year in twelve equal monthly amounts. Beginning with the
notification sent in calendar year 2025, the notification shall include any
adjustment needed for the prior calendar year to account for any difference
between the estimated amount deducted in such prior calendar year and the
actual amount of refunds paid in such year.
(3) Deductions for a refund made pursuant to the ImagiNE Nebraska Act
shall be delayed as provided in this subsection after the refund has been made
to the taxpayer. The Department of Revenue shall notify each municipality
liable for a refund exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars of the pending
refund and the amount of the refund claimed under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act. The
notification shall be made by March 1 of each year beginning in 2021 and shall
be used to establish the refund amount for the following calendar year. The
notification shall include any excess or underpayment from the prior calendar
year. The department shall deduct the refund over a period of one year in equal
monthly amounts beginning in January following the notification. This
subsection applies to total annual refunds exceeding one million dollars or
twenty-five percent of the municipality's total sales and use tax receipts for
the prior fiscal year, whichever is the lesser amount.
(4) Deductions for a refund made pursuant to the Urban Redevelopment Act
shall be delayed as provided in this subsection after the refund has been made
to the taxpayer. The Department of Revenue shall notify each municipality
liable for a refund exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars of the pending
refund and the amount of the refund claimed under the Urban Redevelopment Act.
The notification shall be made by March 1 of each year beginning in 2022 and
shall be used to establish the refund amount for the following calendar year.
The notification shall include any excess or underpayment from the prior
calendar year. The department shall deduct the refund over a period of one year
in equal monthly amounts beginning in January following the notification. This
subsection applies to total annual refunds exceeding one million dollars or
twenty-five percent of the municipality's total sales and use tax receipts for
the prior fiscal year, whichever is the lesser amount.
(5) The Tax Commissioner shall keep full and accurate records of all money
received and distributed under the provisions of the Local Option Revenue Act.
When proceeds of a tax levy are received but the identity of the incorporated
municipality which levied the tax is unknown and is not identified within six
months after receipt, the amount shall be credited to the Municipal
Equalization Fund. The municipality may request the names and addresses of the
retailers which have collected the tax as provided in subsection (13) of
section 77-2711 and may certify an individual to request and review
confidential sales and use tax returns and sales and use tax return information
as provided in subsection (14) of section 77-2711.
(6) When proceeds of a tax levy are received but the identity of the
incorporated municipality which levied the tax is unknown and is not identified
within six months after receipt, the amount shall be credited to the Municipal
Equalization Fund.
(7)(a) (6)(a) Every qualifying business that has filed an application to
receive tax incentives under the Employment and Investment Growth Act, the
Nebraska Advantage Act, the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, or the Urban Redevelopment
Act shall, with respect to such acts, provide annually to each municipality, in
aggregate data, the maximum amount the qualifying business is eligible to
receive in the current year in refunds of local sales and use taxes of the
municipality and exemptions for the previous year, and the estimate of annual
refunds of local sales and use taxes of the municipality and exemptions such
business intends to claim in each future year. The qualifying business shall
provide this information to the municipality on or before June 30 of each year.
Such information shall be kept confidential by the municipality unless publicly
disclosed previously by the taxpayer or by the State of Nebraska.
(b) The municipality may request from the Department of Revenue a list of
the qualifying businesses which have filed an application to receive tax
incentives under the Employment and Investment Growth Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Act, the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, or the Urban Redevelopment Act. The
request may be made annually and shall be submitted to the Department of
Revenue on or before June 30 of each year.
(c) (b) For purposes of this subsection, municipality means a municipality
that has adopted the local option sales and use tax under the Local Option
Revenue Act and to which the qualifying business has paid such sales and use
tax.
(c) The qualifying business shall provide the information to the
municipality on or before June 30 of each year.
(d) Any amounts held by a municipality to make sales and use tax refunds
under the Employment and Investment Growth Act, the Nebraska Advantage Act, the
ImagiNE Nebraska Act, and the Urban Redevelopment Act shall not count toward
any budgeted restricted funds limitation as provided in section 13-519 or
toward any cash reserve limitation as provided in section 13-504 and shall be
excluded from the limitations of the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act.
Sec. 3. Section 77-5725, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-5725 (1) Applicants may qualify for benefits under the Nebraska
-5-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
Advantage Act in one of six tiers:
(a) Tier 1, investment in qualified property of at least one million
dollars and the hiring of at least ten new employees. There shall be no new
project applications for benefits under this tier filed after December 31,
2020. All complete project applications filed on or before December 31, 2020,
shall be considered by the Tax Commissioner and approved if the project and
taxpayer qualify for benefits. Agreements may be executed with regard to
completed project applications filed on or before December 31, 2020. All
project agreements pending, approved, or entered into before such date shall
continue in full force and effect;
(b) Tier 2, (i) investment in qualified property of at least three million
dollars and the hiring of at least thirty new employees or (ii) for a large
data center project, investment in qualified property for the data center of at
least two hundred million dollars and the hiring for the data center of at
least thirty new employees. There shall be no new project applications for
benefits under this tier filed after December 31, 2020. All complete project
applications filed on or before December 31, 2020, shall be considered by the
Tax Commissioner and approved if the project and taxpayer qualify for benefits.
Agreements may be executed with regard to completed project applications filed
on or before December 31, 2020. All project agreements pending, approved, or
entered into before such date shall continue in full force and effect;
(c) Tier 3, the hiring of at least thirty new employees. There shall be no
new project applications for benefits under this tier filed after December 31,
2020. All complete project applications filed on or before December 31, 2020,
shall be considered by the Tax Commissioner and approved if the project and
taxpayer qualify for benefits. Agreements may be executed with regard to
completed project applications filed on or before December 31, 2020. All
project agreements pending, approved, or entered into before such date shall
continue in full force and effect;
(d) Tier 4, investment in qualified property of at least ten million
dollars and the hiring of at least one hundred new employees. There shall be no
new project applications for benefits under this tier filed after December 31,
2020. All complete project applications filed on or before December 31, 2020,
shall be considered by the Tax Commissioner and approved if the project and
taxpayer qualify for benefits. Agreements may be executed with regard to
completed project applications filed on or before December 31, 2020. All
project agreements pending, approved, or entered into before such date shall
continue in full force and effect;
(e) Tier 5, (i) investment in qualified property of at least thirty
million dollars or (ii) for the production of electricity by using one or more
sources of renewable energy to produce electricity for sale as described in
subdivision (1)(j) of section 77-5715, investment in qualified property of at
least twenty million dollars. Failure to maintain an average number of
equivalent employees as defined in section 77-5727 greater than or equal to the
number of equivalent employees in the base year shall result in a partial
recapture of benefits. There shall be no new project applications for benefits
under this tier filed after December 31, 2020. All complete project
applications filed on or before December 31, 2020, shall be considered by the
Tax Commissioner and approved if the project and taxpayer qualify for benefits.
Agreements may be executed with regard to completed project applications filed
on or before December 31, 2020. All project agreements pending, approved, or
entered into before such date shall continue in full force and effect; and
(f) Tier 6, investment in qualified property of at least ten million
dollars and the hiring of at least seventy-five new employees or the investment
in qualified property of at least one hundred million dollars and the hiring of
at least fifty new employees. There shall be no new project applications for
benefits under this tier filed after December 31, 2020. All complete project
applications filed on or before December 31, 2020, shall be considered by the
Tax Commissioner and approved if the project and taxpayer qualify for benefits.
Agreements may be executed with regard to completed project applications filed
on or before December 31, 2020. All project agreements pending, approved, or
entered into before such date shall continue in full force and effect.
(2) When the taxpayer has met the required levels of employment and
investment contained in the agreement for a tier 1, tier 2, tier 4, tier 5, or
tier 6 project, the taxpayer shall be entitled to the following incentives:
(a) A refund of all sales and use taxes for a tier 2, tier 4, tier 5, or
tier 6 project or a refund of one-half of all sales and use taxes for a tier 1
project paid under the Local Option Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967, and sections 13-319, 13-324, 13-2813, and 77-6403 from the date of the
application through the meeting of the required levels of employment and
investment for all purchases, including rentals, of:
(i) Qualified property used as a part of the project;
(ii) Property, excluding motor vehicles, based in this state and used in
both this state and another state in connection with the project except when
any such property is to be used for fundraising for or for the transportation
of an elected official;
(iii) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the owner of the improvement to real
estate when such property is incorporated into real estate as a part of a
project. The refund shall be based on fifty percent of the contract price,
excluding any land, as the cost of materials subject to the sales and use tax;
(iv) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such property is annexed
-6-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
to, but not incorporated into, real estate as a part of a project. The refund
shall be based on the cost of materials subject to the sales and use tax that
were annexed to real estate; and
(v) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such property is both
(A) incorporated into real estate as a part of a project and (B) annexed to,
but not incorporated into, real estate as a part of a project. The refund shall
be based on fifty percent of the contract price, excluding any land, as the
cost of materials subject to the sales and use tax; and
(b)(i) A refund of all sales and use taxes for a tier 2, tier 4, tier 5,
or tier 6 project, excluding the tier 2 and tier 5 projects described in
subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of this section, or a refund of one-half of all sales
and use taxes for a tier 1 project paid under the Local Option Revenue Act, the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and sections 13-319, 13-324, 13-2813, and 77-6403
on the types of purchases, including rentals, listed in subdivision (a) of this
subsection for such taxes paid during each year of the entitlement period in
which the taxpayer is at or above the required levels of employment and
investment; or
(ii) An exemption from all sales and use taxes for a tier 2 large data
center project or a tier 5 project that is sequential to a tier 2 large data
center project imposed under the Local Option Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, and sections 13-319, 13-324, 13-2813, and 77-6403 on the types of
purchases, including rentals, listed in subdivision (a) of this subsection for
such purchases, including rentals, occurring during each year of the
entitlement period in which the taxpayer is at or above the required levels of
employment and investment, except that the exemption shall be for the actual
materials purchased with respect to subdivisions (2)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of
this section. The Tax Commissioner shall issue such rules, regulations,
certificates, and forms as are appropriate to implement the efficient use of
this exemption.
(3) For agreements involving a tier 2 large data center project or a tier
5 project that is sequential to a tier 2 large data center project:
(a) Within sixty days after January 1, 2023, any taxpayer who meets the
requirements of subsection (1) of section 77-2705.01 shall be issued a direct
payment permit under section 77-2705.01, unless the taxpayer has opted out of
this requirement. For any taxpayer who is issued a direct payment permit, until
such taxpayer meets the required levels of employment and investment contained
in the agreement, the taxpayer must pay and remit any applicable sales and use
taxes as required by the Tax Commissioner. Any taxpayer who is issued a direct
payment permit under this subdivision or who otherwise receives the benefit of
any refunds or exemptions under this section shall comply with all data
disclosure requirements in subsection (7) (6) of section 77-27,144, including
disclosures to a municipality which would have received sales and use taxes but
for an exemption allowed under this section; and
(b) If the taxpayer meets the required levels of employment and investment
contained in the agreement, the taxpayer shall receive the sales tax refunds
described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section. For any year in which the
taxpayer is not at the required levels of employment and investment, the
taxpayer shall report all sales and use taxes owed for the period on the
taxpayer's tax return.
(4) Any taxpayer who qualifies for a tier 1, tier 2, tier 3, or tier 4
project shall be entitled to a credit equal to three percent times the average
wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of
the new employees equals at least sixty percent of the Nebraska average annual
wage for the year of application. The credit shall equal four percent times the
average wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the average
wage of the new employees equals at least seventy-five percent of the Nebraska
average annual wage for the year of application. The credit shall equal five
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees if the average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred
percent of the Nebraska average annual wage for the year of application. The
credit shall equal six percent times the average wage of new employees times
the number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees equals at
least one hundred twenty-five percent of the Nebraska average annual wage for
the year of application. For computation of such credit:
(a) Average annual wage means the total compensation paid to employees
during the year at the project who are not base-year employees and who are paid
wages equal to at least sixty percent of the Nebraska average weekly wage for
the year of application, excluding any compensation in excess of one million
dollars paid to any one employee during the year, divided by the number of
equivalent employees making up such total compensation;
(b) Average wage of new employees means the average annual wage paid to
employees during the year at the project who are not base-year employees and
who are paid wages equal to at least sixty percent of the Nebraska average
weekly wage for the year of application, excluding any compensation in excess
of one million dollars paid to any one employee during the year; and
(c) Nebraska average annual wage means the Nebraska average weekly wage
times fifty-two.
(5) Any taxpayer who qualifies for a tier 6 project shall be entitled to a
credit equal to ten percent times the total compensation paid to all employees,
other than base-year employees, excluding any compensation in excess of one
million dollars paid to any one employee during the year, employed at the
project.
-7-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
(6) Any taxpayer who has met the required levels of employment and
investment for a tier 2 or tier 4 project shall receive a credit equal to ten
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the project. Any
taxpayer who has met the required levels of investment and employment for a
tier 1 project shall receive a credit equal to three percent of the investment
made in qualified property at the project. Any taxpayer who has met the
required levels of investment and employment for a tier 6 project shall receive
a credit equal to fifteen percent of the investment made in qualified property
at the project.
(7) The credits prescribed in subsections (4), (5), and (6) of this
section shall be allowable for compensation paid and investments made during
each year of the entitlement period that the taxpayer is at or above the
required levels of employment and investment.
(8) The credit prescribed in subsection (6) of this section shall also be
allowable during the first year of the entitlement period for investment in
qualified property at the project after the date of the application and before
the required levels of employment and investment were met.
(9)(a) Property described in subdivisions (9)(c)(i) through (v) of this
section used in connection with a project or projects, whether purchased or
leased, and placed in service by the taxpayer after the date the application
was filed shall constitute separate classes of property and are eligible for
exemption under the conditions and for the time periods provided in subdivision
(9)(b) of this section.
(b)(i) A taxpayer who has met the required levels of employment and
investment for a tier 4 project shall receive the exemption of property in
subdivisions (9)(c)(ii), (iii), and (iv) of this section. A taxpayer who has
met the required levels of employment and investment for a tier 6 project shall
receive the exemption of property in subdivisions (9)(c)(ii), (iii), (iv), and
(v) of this section. Such property shall be eligible for the exemption from the
first January 1 following the end of the year during which the required levels
were exceeded through the ninth December 31 after the first year property
included in subdivisions (9)(c)(ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of this section
qualifies for the exemption.
(ii) A taxpayer who has filed an application that describes a tier 2 large
data center project or a project under tier 4 or tier 6 shall receive the
exemption of property in subdivision (9)(c)(i) of this section beginning with
the first January 1 following the date the property was placed in service. The
exemption shall continue through the end of the period property included in
subdivisions (9)(c)(ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of this section qualifies for the
exemption.
(iii) A taxpayer who has filed an application that describes a tier 2
large data center project or a tier 5 project that is sequential to a tier 2
large data center project for which the entitlement period has expired shall
receive the exemption of all property in subdivision (9)(c) of this section
beginning any January 1 after the date the property was placed in service. Such
property shall be eligible for exemption from the tax on personal property from
the January 1 preceding the first claim for exemption approved under this
subdivision through the ninth December 31 after the year the first claim for
exemption is approved.
(iv) A taxpayer who has a project for an Internet web portal or a data
center and who has met the required levels of employment and investment for a
tier 2 project or the required level of investment for a tier 5 project, taking
into account only the employment and investment at the web portal or data
center project, shall receive the exemption of property in subdivision (9)(c)
(ii) of this section. Such property shall be eligible for the exemption from
the first January 1 following the end of the year during which the required
levels were exceeded through the ninth December 31 after the first year any
property included in subdivisions (9)(c)(ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of this
section qualifies for the exemption.
(v) Such investment and hiring of new employees shall be considered a
required level of investment and employment for this subsection and for the
recapture of benefits under this subsection only.
(c) The following property used in connection with such project or
projects, whether purchased or leased, and placed in service by the taxpayer
after the date the application was filed shall constitute separate classes of
personal property:
(i) Turbine-powered aircraft, including turboprop, turbojet, and turbofan
aircraft, except when any such aircraft is used for fundraising for or for the
transportation of an elected official;
(ii) Computer systems, made up of equipment that is interconnected in
order to enable the acquisition, storage, manipulation, management, movement,
control, display, transmission, or reception of data involving computer
software and hardware, used for business information processing which require
environmental controls of temperature and power and which are capable of
simultaneously supporting more than one transaction and more than one user. A
computer system includes peripheral components which require environmental
controls of temperature and power connected to such computer systems.
Peripheral components shall be limited to additional memory units, tape drives,
disk drives, power supplies, cooling units, data switches, and communication
controllers;
(iii) Depreciable personal property used for a distribution facility,
including, but not limited to, storage racks, conveyor mechanisms, forklifts,
and other property used to store or move products;
-8-

LB613 LB613
2025 2025
(iv) Personal property which is business equipment located in a single
project if the business equipment is involved directly in the manufacture or
processing of agricultural products; and
(v) For a tier 2 large data center project or tier 6 project, any other
personal property located at the project.
(d) In order to receive the property tax exemptions allowed by subdivision
(9)(c) of this section, the taxpayer shall annually file a claim for exemption
with the Tax Commissioner on or before May 1. The form and supporting schedules
shall be prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and shall list all property for
which exemption is being sought under this section. A separate claim for
exemption must be filed for each project and each county in which property is
claimed to be exempt. A copy of this form must also be filed with the county
assessor in each county in which the applicant is requesting exemption. The Tax
Commissioner shall determine whether a taxpayer is eligible to obtain exemption
for personal property based on the criteria for exemption and the eligibility
of each item listed for exemption and, on or before August 1, certify such to
the taxpayer and to the affected county assessor.
(10)(a) The investment thresholds in this section for a particular year of
application shall be adjusted by the method provided in this subsection, except
that the investment threshold for a tier 5 project described in subdivision (1)
(e)(ii) of this section shall not be adjusted.
(b) For tier 1, tier 2, tier 4, and tier 5 projects other than tier 5
projects described in subdivision (1)(e)(ii) of this section, beginning October
1, 2006, and each October 1 thereafter, the average Producer Price Index for
all commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Labor Statistics, for the most recent twelve available periods shall be divided
by the Producer Price Index for the first quarter of 2006 and the result
multiplied by the applicable investment threshold. The investment thresholds
shall be adjusted for cumulative inflation since 2006.
(c) For tier 6, beginning October 1, 2008, and each October 1 thereafter,
the average Producer Price Index for all commodities, published by the United
States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the most recent
twelve available periods shall be divided by the Producer Price Index for the
first quarter of 2008 and the result multiplied by the applicable investment
threshold. The investment thresholds shall be adjusted for cumulative inflation
since 2008.
(d) For a tier 2 large data center project, beginning October 1, 2012, and
each October 1 thereafter, the average Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Labor Statistics, for the most recent twelve available periods shall be divided
by the Producer Price Index for the first quarter of 2012 and the result
multiplied by the applicable investment threshold. The investment thresholds
shall be adjusted for cumulative inflation since 2012.
(e) If the resulting amount is not a multiple of one million dollars, the
amount shall be rounded to the next lowest one million dollars.
(f) The investment thresholds established by this subsection apply for
purposes of project qualifications for all applications filed on or after
January 1 of the following year for all years of the project. Adjustments do
not apply to projects after the year of application.
Sec. 4. Original sections 77-2711, 77-27,144, and 77-5725, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-9-